test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_haanis_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - häänis:
    häänis+A+Sg+Nom: häänis
    häänis+A+Attr: hänis
    häänis+A+Sg+Gen: háánnás
    häänis+A+Sg+Acc: háánnás
    häänis+A+Sg+Ill: hánásân
    häänis+A+Sg+Loc: hánásist
    häänis+A+Sg+Com: hánásáin
    häänis+A+Sg+Abe: háánnásttáá
    häänis+A+Ess: hänisin
    häänis+A+Par: hänisid
    häänis+A+Pl+Nom: hánáseh
    häänis+A+Pl+Gen: hánásij
    häänis+A+Pl+Acc: hánásijd
    häänis+A+Pl+Ill: hánásáid
    häänis+A+Pl+Loc: hánásijn
    häänis+A+Pl+Com: [hánásijguin, hánásijgijn]
    häänis+A+Pl+Abe: hánásijttáá

  Adjective - hurskes: # 2A A_VEESKIR
    hurskes+A+Sg+Nom: hurskes
    hurskes+A+Attr: hurskes 
    hurskes+A+Sg+Gen: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Acc: hurskás
    hurskes+A+Sg+Ill: hurskásân
    hurskes+A+Sg+Loc: hurskásist
    hurskes+A+Sg+Com: hurskásáin
    hurskes+A+Sg+Abe: hurskásttáá
    hurskes+A+Ess:    hurskesin
    hurskes+A+Par:    hurskesid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Nom: hurskáseh
    hurskes+A+Pl+Gen: hurskásij
    hurskes+A+Pl+Acc: hurskásijd
    hurskes+A+Pl+Ill: hurskásáid
    hurskes+A+Pl+Loc: hurskásijn
    hurskes+A+Pl+Com: [hurskásijguin, hurskásijgijn]
    hurskes+A+Pl+Abe: hurskásijttáá

    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: hurskásub
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: hurskásuubon
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: hurskásubboost
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: hurskásubboin
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: hurskásubttáá
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: hurskásuboh
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: hurskásuboi
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: hurskásuboid
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: hurskásubboid
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: hurskásuboin
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [hurskásuboiguin, hurskásuboigijn]
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: hurskásuboittáá
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: hurskásubbon
    hurskes+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: hurskásubbod

    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: hurskásumos
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: hurskásumosân
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: hurskásumosist
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: hurskásumosáin
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: hurskásumosttáá
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: hurskásumoseh
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: hurskásumosij
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: hurskásumosijd
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: hurskásumosáid
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: hurskásumosijn
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [hurskásumosijguin, hurskásumosijgijn]
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: hurskásumosijttáá
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: hurskásumosin
    hurskes+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: hurskásumosid
